Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.360

Driving records.

To assist in identifying impairment related to alcohol abuse, the commission may obtain a copy of the driving record of a physician or a physician assistant maintained by the department of licensing.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 334; 1991 c 215 s 2. Formerly RCW 18.72.345.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.